Arkansas, session 2025, HB1785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-8-106(a)(1), concerning the county
depository board, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The quorum court of each of the several counties shall by
ordinance establish a county depository board.
(B) The county depository board is to be composed of the
county judge, the county treasurer and county collector, or the sheriff when
acting as ex officio tax collector, or those officials performing the duties
of the above officials where an elective county office has been changed in
accordance with Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 55.
(C)(i) If the offices of county treasurer and county
collector have been combined by law, the third member of the county
depository board shall be one (1) of the other elected county constitutional
officers as selected by the county quorum court.
(ii) The county quorum court shall pass an ordinance
selecting the third member of the county depository board under subdivision
(a)(1)(C)(i) of this section.


*SSS239*
03/13/2025 2:23:14 PM SSS239